North Carolina, session 2025, SB847.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:

PART I. REQUIRE FULL INVESTIGATIONS FOR APPARENT SUICIDES
SECTION 1.(a) Article 1 of Chapter 15 of the General Statutes is amended by adding
a new section to read:
"§ 15-7.1. Postmortem investigations required; apparent suicide.
(a) Applicability. – This section applies to cases where the initial manner of death appears
to be suicide.
(b) Investigation Required. – No manner of death shall be officially determined as suicide
until a full investigation into the circumstances of death has been conducted and documented,
including completion of all of the following, subject to the provisions of the Fourth Amendment
to the United States Constitution relating to unreasonable searches and seizures:
(1) Interviews or attempted interviews of any individuals present at or connected
to the scene of death.
(2) Gunshot residue testing or attempted gunshot residue testing on any
individuals present at the scene of death if firearms were involved.
(3) The county medical examiner's duties pursuant to Article 16 of Chapter 130A
of the General Statutes."
SECTION 1.(b) G.S. 130A-385 reads as rewritten:
"§ 130A-385. Duties of medical examiner upon receipt of notice; reports; copies.
…
(b) The medical examiner shall complete a certificate of death, stating the name of the
disease that, in the opinion of the medical examiner, caused death. If the death was from external
causes, the medical examiner shall state on the certificate of death the means of death, and
whether, in the medical examiner's opinion, the manner of death was accident, suicide, homicide,
execution by the State, or undetermined. The medical examiner shall also furnish any information
as may be required by the State Registrar of Vital Statistics in order to properly classify the death.
(b1) Notwithstanding subsection (b) of this section, the Chief Medical Examiner or the
county medical examiner shall not officially determine the manner of death to be suicide until a
full investigation has been conducted and documented pursuant to G.S. 15-7.1.
*S847-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
…."
SECTION 1.(c) This Part is effective when it becomes law and applies to deaths that
occur on or after that date.

PART II. INCREASE FEES PAID TO COUNTY MEDICAL EXAMINERS
SECTION 2.(a) G.S. 130A-387 reads as rewritten:
"§ 130A-387. Fees.
For each investigation and prompt filing of the required report, the medical examiner shall
receive a fee paid by the State. However, if the deceased is a resident of the county in which the
death or fatal injury occurred, that county shall pay the fee. The fee shall be two hundred dollars
($200.00).four hundred dollars ($400.00)."
SECTION 2.(b) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Public Health, Office of the Chief Medical Examiner,
the sum of five hundred seventy-nine thousand dollars ($579,000) in recurring funds beginning
in the 2026-2027 fiscal year to increase the medical examiner fee authorized by G.S. 130A-387
from two hundred dollars ($200.00) to four hundred dollars ($400.00) per investigation and
report, effective July 1, 2026.
SECTION 2.(c) This Part becomes effective July 1, 2026, and applies to fees
imposed for medical examiner reports filed on or after that date.

PART III. EFFECTIVE DATE
SECTION 3. Except as otherwise provided, this act is effective when it becomes
law.
Page 2 Senate Bill 847-First Edition